Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 2. Extended Benefits Program

§ 1421.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases, as used in this subchapter, shall have the following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Extended benefit period” means a period which:

begins with the third week after a week for which there is a State “on” indicator; and

ends with either of the following weeks, whichever occurs later:

the third week after the first week for which there is a State “off” indicator; or

the 13th consecutive week of such period;

However, no extended benefit period may begin by reason of a State “on” indicator before the 14th week following the end of a prior extended benefit period which was in effect with respect to this State.

State “on” indicator.

There is a State “on” indicator for a week beginning after September 25, 1982 and before March 7, 1993, if the Commissioner determines, in accordance with the regulations of the Secretary of Labor of the United States, that, for the period consisting of such week and the immediately preceding 12 weeks, the rate of insured unemployment, not seasonally adjusted, under this chapter:

equaled or exceeded six percent; or

equaled or exceeded five percent and equaled or exceeded 120 percent of the average of those rates for the corresponding 13-week period ending in each of the two preceding calendar years.

There is a State “on” indicator for a week beginning after March 6, 1993, if:

The requirements of either subdivision (A)(i) or (ii) of this subdivision (2) are satisfied; or

The average rate of total unemployment in this State (seasonally adjusted) for the period consisting of the most recent three months for which data for all states are published before the close of such week:

equaled or exceeded 6.5 percent; and

equaled or exceeded 110 percent of such average rate for either (or both) of the corresponding three-month periods ending in the two preceding calendar years.

State “off” indicator.

There is a State “off” indicator for a week beginning after September 25, 1982 and before March 7, 1993, if the Commissioner determines, in accordance with the regulations of the Secretary of Labor of the United States, that, for the period consisting of that week and the immediately preceding 12 weeks, the rate of insured unemployment, not seasonally adjusted, under this chapter was:

less than five percent; or

less than six percent and less than 120 percent of the average of those rates for the corresponding 13-week period ending in each of the preceding two calendar years.

There is a State “off” indicator for a week beginning after March 6, 1993, if there would be a State “off” indicator pursuant to subdivision (3)(A) of this section and the requirements of either subdivision (2)(B)(ii)(I) or (II) of this section are not satisfied.

“Rate of insured unemployment” and “rate of total unemployment.”

“Rate of insured unemployment,” for purposes of subdivisions (2)(A) and (3)(A) of this section, means the percentage derived by dividing the average weekly number of individuals filing claims for regular benefits in this State for weeks of unemployment with respect to the most recent 13-consecutive-week period, as determined by the Commissioner on the basis of his or her reports to the Secretary of Labor of the United States, by the average monthly employment covered under this chapter for the first four of the most recent six completed calendar quarters ending before the end of the 13-week period.

For purposes of subdivisions (2)(B) and (3)(B) of this section, determinations of the “rate of total unemployment” in this State for any period (and of any seasonal adjustment) shall be made by the Secretary of Labor of the United States.

“Regular benefits” mean benefits payable to an individual under this chapter or under any other State law, including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen pursuant to chapter 85 of Title 5 of the U.S. Code, other than extended benefits.

“Extended benefits” mean benefits, including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen pursuant to chapter 85 of Title 5 of the U.S. Code, payable to an individual under the provisions of this section for weeks of unemployment in his or her eligibility period.

“Eligibility period” of an individual means the period consisting of weeks in his or her benefit year which begin in an extended benefit period and, if his or her benefit year ends within the extended benefit period, any weeks thereafter which begin in that period.

“Exhaustee” means an individual who, with respect to any week of unemployment in his or her eligibility period:

has received, prior to such week, all of the regular benefits that were available to him or her under this chapter or any other state law, including dependent’s allowances and benefits payable to federal civilian employees and ex-servicemen under chapter 85 of Title 5 of the U.S. Code, in his or her current benefit year that includes the week; provided that, for the purposes of this subdivision, an individual shall be deemed to have received all of the regular benefits that were available to him or her although as a result of a pending appeal with respect to wages or employment that were not considered in the original monetary determination in his or her benefit year, he or she may subsequently be determined to be entitled to added regular benefits; or

his or her benefit year having expired prior to the week, has no, or insufficient, wages or employment on the basis of which he or she could establish a new benefit year that would include that week; and

has no right to unemployment benefits or allowances, as the case may be, under the Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act, and such other federal laws as are specified in regulations issued by the Secretary of Labor of the United States; and has not received and is not seeking unemployment benefits under the unemployment compensation law of Canada; but if he or she is seeking such benefits and the appropriate agency finally determines that he or she is not entitled to benefits under such law he or she is considered an exhaustee.

“State law” means the unemployment insurance law of any state, approved by the Secretary of Labor of the United States under section 3304 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

“Suitable work” means, with respect to any individual, any work which is within the individual’s capabilities; except that, if the individual furnished evidence satisfactory to the Commissioner that the individual’s prospects for obtaining work in his or her customary occupation within a reasonably short period are good, the determination of whether any work is suitable work with respect to the individual shall be made in accordance with the provisions of subdivision 1344(a)(2) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 1

, § 2, eff. Oct. 11, 1970; amended

1973, No. 231

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 3, 1974;

1977, No. 64

, § 20, eff. May 1, 1977;

1979, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. March 31, 1980;

1981, No. 86

, § 5, eff. April 5, 1981;

1981, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Sept. 25, 1982;

1993, No. 58

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1422.
Regular and extended benefits.

Except when the result would be inconsistent with the other provisions of this subchapter the provisions of this chapter which apply to claims for, or the payment of, regular benefits shall apply to claims for, and the payment of, extended benefits.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 1

, § 2, eff. Oct. 11, 1970.

§ 1423.
Eligibility requirements for extended benefits.

An individual shall be eligible to receive extended benefits with respect to any week of unemployment in his or her eligibility period only if the Commissioner finds that with respect to such week:

he or she is an “exhaustee” as defined in section 1421 of this title,

he or she has satisfied the requirements of this chapter for the receipt of regular benefits that are applicable to individuals claiming extended benefits, including not being subject to a disqualification for the receipt of benefits.

For eligibility periods based upon benefit years beginning on and after January 3, 1988 and before March 7, 1993, the total wages paid which established that benefit year must equal or exceed one and one-half times the wages paid in the highest quarter of that base period.

For eligibility periods based upon benefit years beginning on and after March 7, 1993, the total wages paid which established that benefit year must exceed 40 times the individual’s most recent weekly benefit amount.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, an individual shall not be eligible for extended benefits for any week if:

extended benefits are payable for such week pursuant to an interstate claim filed in any state under the interstate benefit payment plan, and

no extended benefit period is in effect for such week in such state.

Subsection (b) of this section shall not apply with respect to the first two weeks for which extended benefits are payable pursuant to an interstate claim filed under this interstate benefit payment plan to the individual from the extended compensation account established for the individual with respect to the benefit year.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 1

, § 2, eff. Oct. 11, 1970; amended

1981, No. 86

, § 2, eff. May 31, 1981;

1981, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 22, 1982;

1985, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1993, No. 58

, §§ 2, 3, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1423a.
Disqualifications.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, if so found by the Commissioner, payment of extended compensation shall not be made to any individual for any week of unemployment in his or her eligibility period:

during which he or she fails to accept any offer of suitable work; or

fails to apply for any suitable work to which he or she was referred by the Commissioner; or

during which he or she fails to actively engage in seeking work.

If any individual is ineligible for extended compensation for any week by reason of a failure described in subsection (a) of this section, the individual shall be ineligible to receive extended compensation for any week which begins during a period which:

begins with the week following the week in which such failure occurs; and

does not end until such individual has been employed during at least four weeks which begin after such failure and the total of the remuneration earned by the individual for being so employed is not less than the product of six multiplied by the individual’s average weekly benefit amount as determined for his or her benefit year.

Extended compensation shall not be denied under subsection (a) of this section to any individual for any week by reason of a failure to accept an offer of, or apply for, suitable work:

if the gross average weekly remuneration payable to that individual for the position does not exceed the sum of:

the individual’s average weekly benefit amount as determined for his or her benefit year, plus

the amount, if any, of supplemental unemployment compensation benefits, as defined in section 501(c)(17)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, payable to that individual for that week;

if the position was not offered to the individual in writing and was not listed with the State employment service;

if the failure would not result in a denial of compensation under the provisions of subdivision 1344(a)(2) of this title to the extent that those provisions are not inconsistent with the provisions of subdivision 1421(10) of this title and subsection (d) of this section; or

if the position pays wages less than the higher of:

the minimum wage provided by section 6(a)(1) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, without regard to any exemption; or

any applicable state or local minimum wage.

For purposes of this subsection, an individual shall be treated as actively engaged in seeking work during any week if:

the individual has engaged in a systematic and sustained effort to obtain work during that week, and

the individual provides tangible evidence to the Commissioner that he or she has engaged in such an effort during that week.

No provision of section 1344 which terminates a disqualification for voluntarily leaving employment, being discharged for misconduct, or refusing suitable employment shall apply for purposes of determining eligibility for extended compensation unless that termination is based upon employment subsequent to the date of the disqualification.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 86

, § 4, eff. April 5, 1981; amended

1981, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Sept. 25, 1982.

§ 1423b.
Repealed. 2009, No. 156 (Adj. Sess.), § E.401.4, eff. June 3, 2010.

§ 1424.
Weekly extended benefit amount.

The weekly extended benefit amount payable to an individual for a week of total unemployment in his or her eligibility period shall be an amount equal to the weekly benefit amount payable to him or her during his or her applicable benefit year.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 1

, § 2, eff. Oct. 11, 1970; amended

1981, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. Sept. 26, 1982;

1985, No. 50

, § 10.

§ 1425.
Total extended benefit amount.

The total extended benefit amount payable to any eligible individual with respect to his or her applicable benefit year shall be the least of the following amounts:

50 percent of the total amount of regular benefits which were payable to him or her under this chapter in his or her applicable benefit year;

13 times his or her weekly benefit amount which was payable to him or her under this chapter for a week of total unemployment in the applicable benefit year.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, if the benefit year of any individual ends within an extended benefit period, the remaining balance of extended benefits that such individual would, but for this section, be entitled to receive in that extended benefit period, with respect to weeks of unemployment beginning after the end of the benefit year, shall be reduced (but not below zero) by the product of the number of weeks for which the individual received trade readjustment allowances within that benefit year, multiplied by the individual’s weekly benefit amount for extended benefits.

Effective with respect to weeks beginning in a high unemployment period, subsection (a) of this section shall be applied by substituting:

“80 percent” for “50 percent” in subsection (a)(1) of this section; and

“20” for “13” in subdivision (a)(2).

For purposes of subsection (c) of this section, the term “high unemployment period” means any period during which an extended benefit period would be in effect if subdivision 1421(2)(B)(ii)(I) of this title were applied by substituting “8 percent” for “6.5 percent.”

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 1

, § 2, eff. Oct. 11, 1970; amended

1981, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. Oct. 31, 1982;

1993, No. 58

, § 4, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1426.
Beginning and termination of extended benefit period.

Whenever an extended benefit period is to become effective in this State, as a result of a State “on” indicator, or an extended benefit period is to be terminated in this State as a result of a State “off” indicator, the Commissioner shall make an appropriate public announcement.

Computations required by the provisions of section 1421 of this title shall be made by the Commissioner, in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Secretary of Labor of the United States.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 1

, § 2, eff. Oct. 11, 1970; amended

1981, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. April 22, 1982.

§ 1427.
Amendments to the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970.

To the extent that the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970 has been or may be amended so as to authorize this State to pay benefits for an extended benefit period in a manner other than provided by this title, then, and in such cases, all the terms and conditions contained in the amended provisions of such federal law shall become a part of this title to the extent necessary to authorize the payment of benefits to eligible individuals as permitted under such provisions, provided that the federal share continues to be at least 50 percent of the extended benefits paid to individuals under the extended benefits program.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 58

, § 5, eff. June 3, 1993.